Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.030

Minimum qualifications—Rules.

(1) The secretary shall adopt rules specifying the minimum qualifications for a medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, medical assistant-phlebotomist, medical assistant-EMT, and forensic phlebotomist.

(a) The qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician must be equivalent to the qualifications for hemodialysis technicians regulated pursuant to *chapter 18.135 RCW as of January 1, 2012.

(b) The qualifications for a forensic phlebotomist must include training consistent with the occupational safety and health administration guidelines and must include between twenty and thirty hours of work in a clinical setting with the completion of more than one hundred successful venipunctures. The secretary may not require more than 40 hours of classroom training for initial training, which may include online preclass homework.

(c) The qualifications for a medical assistant-EMT must be consistent with the qualifications for the emergency medical technician certification pursuant to RCW 18.73.081; the advanced emergency medical technician certification pursuant to RCW 18.71.205; or the paramedic certification pursuant to RCW 18.71.205. The secretary must ensure that any person with an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic certification is eligible for a medical assistant-EMT certification with no additional training or examination requirements if the certification for the emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or a paramedic is in good standing.

(2) The secretary shall adopt rules that establish the minimum requirements necessary for a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice to endorse a medical assistant as qualified to perform the duties authorized by this chapter and be able to file an attestation of that endorsement with the department.

[ 2024 c 217 s 3; 2019 c 55 s 8; 2017 c 336 s 16; 2012 c 153 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 18.135 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 153 s 20.

Finding—2017 c 336: See note following RCW 9.96.060.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.